Utah statutes.
53B-10-102.   Number of incentive loans -- Criteria for awarding.
(1) (a)  A total of 365 Terrel H. Bell Teaching Incentive Loans shall be
maintained each year in accordance with criteria and procedures established by
the State Board of Regents, except that if the annual appropriation for this
program is not sufficient to fund 365 loans, the State Board of Regents may
reduce the total number of incentive loans awarded each year to correspond to
the appropriation level.
(b)  The number of incentive loans to be awarded shall be reviewed annually
based on the need to prepare individuals to teach as determined by the supply
of and demand for teachers in the state.
(2)  These incentive loans shall be awarded in the following categories:
(a)  incentive loans for college students who have successfully completed not
less than the equivalent of two semesters of formal higher education study;
and
(b)  incentive loans for persons described in Subsection 53B-10-101(5)(c),
including:
(i)  part-time college students who are enrolled in at least six semester
hours;
(ii)  college students who already hold a bachelor's degree; and
(iii)  other nontraditional college students who are enrolled in at least six
semester hours; and
(c)  a limited number of high school seniors, as selected by the State Board
of Education in a statewide competition, if the annual appropriation for the
program meets or exceeds the 365 loans under Subsection (1)(a).
